New York, session 2025-2026, S8499.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Legionnaires' disease prevention act". 3 § 2. Article 21 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 4 title 9 to read as follows: 5 TITLE IX 6 LEGIONNAIRES' DISEASE 7 Section 2186. Public water system water treatment, monitoring 8 and management. 9 2186-a. Water user notification of public water system 10 disruptions. 11 2186-b. Legionnaires' disease case investigation and registry. 12 2186-c. Legionnaires' disease reporting and public water system 13 sampling. 14 2186-d. Building water management plans. 15 2186-e. Annual report. 16 2186-f. Disposition of fines. 17 § 2186. Public water system water treatment, monitoring and manage- 18 ment. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or rule or regu- 19 lation to the contrary, and no later than one year after the effective 20 date of this section, the owner or operator of a public water system 21 shall: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13673-02-6 S. 8499--A 2 1 (a) maintain a detectable disinfectant residual of free chlorine of at 2 least 0.5 milligrams per liter in all active parts of the public water 3 system at all times; systems that use monochloramine shall maintain a 4 detectable disinfectant residual of at least one milligram per liter in 5 all active parts of the public water system at all times; and 6 (b) conduct disinfectant residual testing at frequent and regular 7 intervals to determine the amount and type of detectable disinfectant 8 residual existing at different points in the public water system. 9 2. (a) If the owner or operator of the public water system fails to 10 meet the minimum detectable disinfectant residual targets established 11 pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section, the 12 department of environmental conservation shall investigate such 13 violation or, at its discretion, authorize a third-party entity to 14 conduct the investigation. The department of environmental conservation 15 is authorized to impose fines on the owner or operator of a public water 16 system for violations of this section and for failure to comply with the 17 requirements of this article. 18 (b) The department of environmental conservation shall develop proce- 19 dures and guidelines regarding the investigation of an owner or operator 20 of a public water system conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this 21 subdivision, including, but not limited, to: 22 (i) the definition of what constitutes a repeated failure to meet the 23 minimum detectable disinfectant residual targets; 24 (ii) the requirements for reporting violations of the minimum detect- 25 able disinfectant residual targets; 26 (iii) when to initiate an initial investigation of violations of mini- 27 mum detectable disinfectant residual targets and subsequent investi- 28 gations; 29 (iv) the establishment of penalties for a violation of minimum detect- 30 able disinfectant residual targets, if such department determines that a 31 violation has occurred; 32 (v) the development of a notice to inform water consumers if a public 33 water system fails to maintain the minimum detectable disinfectant resi- 34 dual targets established pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision one of 35 this section; and 36 (vi) the criteria used by the department to select appropriate third- 37 party entities to conduct investigations of additional violations of 38 minimum detectable disinfectant residual targets. 39 3. (a) No later than eighteen months after the effective date of this 40 section, the department of environmental conservation, in consultation 41 with the department, shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the 42 state administrative procedure act, to: 43 (i) require additional disinfectant requirements or testing require- 44 ments of public water systems if deemed necessary; 45 (ii) to increase the minimum detectable disinfectant residual to mini- 46 mize the growth and transmission of legionella bacteria; 47 (iii) require nitrification action plans for public water systems that 48 utilize monochloramine to reduce stagnation and dead legs; and 49 (iv) establish requirements for the monitoring of public water systems 50 for legionella and adequate treatment during: 51 (1) construction activities; 52 (2) a change in the water treatment process; 53 (3) any planned or unplanned event that reduces water delivery pres- 54 sure below twenty pounds per square inch; 55 (4) a lead service line replacement; 56 (5) a new construction tie-in; S. 8499--A 3 1 (6) a source water change; 2 (7) water treatment plant maintenance or changes; 3 (8) changes in directional water flow; 4 (9) flooding; 5 (10) replacement of valves, hydrants, or meters; 6 (11) pumping failures; 7 (12) pipeline or water main breaks; 8 (13) system repairs; or 9 (14) emergency conditions or other disruptions as determined by the 10 department that may impact the public water system. 11 (b) The department of environmental conservation shall not reduce the 12 minimum detectable disinfectant residual targets established pursuant to 13 paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section. 14 4. The department of environmental conservation shall submit an annual 15 report to the governor and to the legislature beginning three years 16 after the effective date of this section with its recommendations as to 17 whether the minimum detectable disinfectant residual targets established 18 pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section should be 19 increased to minimize the growth and transmission of legionella bacte- 20 ria. 21 § 2186-a. Water user notification of public water system disruptions. 22 1. The owner or operator of a public water system shall provide a time- 23 ly written notice, in a form and manner as determined by the department 24 of environmental conservation pursuant to subdivision three of this 25 section, to all residential, commercial, and institutional customers and 26 residents served by the public water system and located in an affected 27 area of disruptions in the water distribution system that could result 28 in increased levels of legionella bacteria being present in the public 29 water system. The content of such notice shall be developed in consulta- 30 tion with the department and shall include, but are not limited to: 31 (a) notification that planned construction, maintenance, repair, or 32 replacement of a part of the system may affect legionella bacteria in 33 the water distribution system and temporarily increase the level of 34 legionella bacteria in the public water system; 35 (b) the estimated length of time that the level of legionella bacteria 36 may remain elevated, as determined by the department; 37 (c) general information on the possible sources of legionella bacteria 38 in the public water system, and the health effects of Legionnaires' 39 disease and related illnesses to at-risk populations; and 40 (d) measures consumers can take to reduce or eliminate exposure to 41 legionella bacteria, including, but not limited to, ensuring hot water 42 heaters are working properly with regular flushing and maintaining a 43 temperature of at least one hundred thirty degrees Fahrenheit at the 44 water heater outlet, flushing water lines, including the hot water heat- 45 er drain and external hose connections during and after completion of 46 construction work, removing and cleaning faucet aerator screens and 47 showerheads, and installing a water filter or water treatment device 48 certified to remove legionella bacteria. 49 2. No later than one year after the effective date of this section, 50 the department of environmental conservation, in consultation with the 51 department and the division of consumer protection, shall publish a 52 public notice in the state register and on its Internet website specify- 53 ing the form and manner of the notice required pursuant to subdivision 54 one of this section and the specific information to be included in the 55 notice. S. 8499--A 4 1 3. (a) The owner or operator of a public water system shall provide a 2 written record of a disruption in the water distribution system to the 3 department of environmental conservation within twenty-four hours of the 4 occurrence of the disruption in the water distribution system. As used 5 in this act, "disruption in the water distribution system" means any 6 disruption to normal water transmission, including, but not limited to: 7 (i) a change in the water treatment process, including temporary 8 changes from a chloramine residual to a free chlorine residual or vice 9 versa; 10 (ii) any planned or unplanned event that reduces water delivery pres- 11 sure below twenty pounds per square inch; 12 (iii) a lead service line replacement; 13 (iv) a new construction tie-in; 14 (v) a source water change; 15 (vi) water treatment plant maintenance or changes; 16 (vii) changes in directional water flow; 17 (viii) flooding; 18 (ix) replacement of valves, hydrants, or meters; 19 (x) pumping failures; 20 (xi) pipeline or water main breaks; 21 (xii) system repairs; or 22 (xiii) emergency conditions. 23 (b) The department of environmental conservation shall establish on 24 its Internet website a publicly accessible database of the records of a 25 disruption in the water distribution system received by the department 26 pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision. 27 § 2186-b. Legionnaires' disease case investigation and registry. 1. 28 For every reported diagnosis of Legionnaires' disease, the department 29 shall: 30 (a) conduct a comprehensive investigation into the reported case; 31 (b) advise the individual diagnosed with Legionnaires' disease about 32 the availability of testing by the department of the fixtures and 33 water-using equipment in the individual's residence, locations frequent- 34 ly visited, and places of employment in the fourteen days immediately 35 prior to the individual's diagnosis; and 36 (c) in a manner consistent with the consent provided by the individual 37 diagnosed with Legionnaires' disease or the owner of the property, 38 sample and test the fixtures and water-using equipment for the presence 39 of legionella bacteria, each test shall be conducted by a laboratory 40 certified for this purpose by the department. 41 2. The department shall develop procedures and guidelines regarding 42 the investigation of every reported diagnosis of Legionnaires' disease 43 pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision one of this section, including, 44 but not limited to: 45 (a) documentation of any disruption in the water distribution system 46 serving the primary residence or water exposure points frequented by an 47 infected individual in the fourteen days preceding infection, that may 48 have caused the release of legionella bacteria into the home or other 49 water exposure point frequented by the infected individual during that 50 period; 51 (b) investigation of potential sources of exposure to legionella 52 bacteria from fixtures, water-using equipment, or features at the indi- 53 vidual's residence including water exposures external to the residence 54 such as irrigation, hoses, or water-based equipment and devices; 55 (c) investigation of potential sources of exposure to legionella 56 bacteria from other identified water exposure points such as visits to S. 8499--A 5 1 buildings, water features, car washes, irrigation systems, exposure to 2 pressure washing, car windshield fluids, public fountains or toilets, or 3 other aspects of daily travel and activities; and 4 (d) all sampling and testing carried out pursuant to this section 5 shall include, but not be limited to, testing for the presence of 6 legionella pneumophila, and shall be conducted in a manner consistent 7 with rules, regulations, and best practices developed by the department. 8 3. The department may delegate its responsibilities and duties pursu- 9 ant to this section as deemed appropriate for administering the testing 10 and investigatory provisions of this section to a local health officer 11 having jurisdiction over the locality in which a patient diagnosed with 12 Legionnaires' disease lives, frequently visits, or is employed. 13 4. The department shall establish on its Internet website a registry 14 accessible to the public of de-identified data related to each case of 15 Legionnaires' disease reported to the department. As used in this subdi- 16 vision, "de-identified data" means information that does not identify an 17 individual and for which there is no reasonable basis to believe that 18 the information can be used to identify an individual, and which meets 19 the requirements for de-identification of protected health information 20 under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 21 and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the secretary of the 22 United States department of health and human services. The department 23 shall make every effort to provide information on the approximate 24 location of a case of Legionnaires' disease to the nearest city block or 25 general neighborhood description while ensuring the protection of an 26 individual's privacy. 27 § 2186-c. Legionnaires' disease reporting and public water system 28 sampling. 1. For every reported diagnosis of Legionnaires' disease, the 29 department shall immediately provide notification to the department of 30 environmental conservation of the diagnosis. This notification shall 31 include addresses where the individual diagnosed with Legionnaires' 32 disease resided, frequently visited, or was employed in the month imme- 33 diately prior to the individual's diagnosis. 34 2. Upon receipt of notification from the department pursuant to subdi- 35 vision one of this section, the department of environmental conservation 36 shall sample and test or order the sampling and testing of the public 37 water system for the presence of legionella bacteria, at all locations 38 identified by the department. Each test shall be conducted by a labora- 39 tory certified for this purpose by the department, and in accordance 40 with the sampling and testing methods established and provided by the 41 department. All sampling and testing carried out pursuant to this 42 subdivision shall include, but not be limited to, testing for the pres- 43 ence of legionella pneumophila, and shall be conducted in a manner 44 consistent with rules, regulations, and best practices developed by the 45 department. 46 3. The department of environmental conservation shall conduct or 47 require the owner or operator of the applicable public water system to 48 conduct further testing to confirm the presence of legionella bacteria 49 in any source in which the bacteria is detected through initial testing 50 pursuant to this subdivision, as it determines to be necessary. All 51 sampling and testing carried out pursuant to this subdivision shall 52 include, but not be limited to, testing for the presence of legionella 53 pneumophila, and shall be conducted in a manner consistent with rules, 54 regulations, and best practices developed by the department. 55 § 2186-d. Building water management plans. 1. No later than eighteen 56 months after the effective date of this section, the owner or operator S. 8499--A 6 1 of a building that meets the criteria set forth in the American Society 2 of Heating, Refrigeration, and Air Conditioning Engineers (ASHRAE) Stan- 3 dard 188-2021, Legionellosis: Risk Management for Building Water 4 Systems, shall implement a water management program to minimize the 5 growth and transmission of legionella bacteria in the building's water 6 system, consistent with ASHRAE Standard 188-2021 and ASHRAE Guideline 7 12-2023, Managing the Risk of Legionellosis Associated with Building 8 Water Systems. 9 2. The owner or operator of a facility or building required to imple- 10 ment a water management program pursuant to this section shall make the 11 water management program available upon request to an employee of the 12 department, the department of environmental conservation or any other 13 department or agency with license or inspection authority for the facil- 14 ity or building. 15 3. The department, the department of environmental conservation or any 16 other department or agency with license or inspection authority for the 17 facility or building is authorized to impose fines on an owner or opera- 18 tor of a building that meets the criteria in ASHRAE Standard 188-2021 19 for violations of this section consistent with existing fine structures, 20 provided the owner or operator of a building is provided with due proc- 21 ess and fair hearing rights. 22 § 2186-e. Annual report. No later than two years after the effective 23 date of this act and annually thereafter, the department, in consulta- 24 tion with the department of environmental conservation and the division 25 of consumer protection shall submit a report to the governor, and to the 26 legislature, which shall include: 27 1. the number of cases of Legionnaire's disease in the state reported 28 in each of the previous ten years; 29 2. the number and type of violations for which penalties were assessed 30 under this article; and 31 3. recommendations for legislative action as may be necessary to 32 further control legionella bacteria and other waterborne pathogens in 33 the public water supply and affected buildings. 34 § 2186-f. Disposition of fines. All fines collected as the result of 35 violations of this article shall be deposited into the Legionnaires' 36 disease prevention fund established pursuant to section ninety-nine-uu 37 of the state finance law to support state implementation of this title. 38 § 3. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 99-uu to 39 read as follows: 40 § 99-uu. Legionnaires' disease prevention fund. 1. There is hereby 41 established in the joint custody of the comptroller, the commissioner of 42 taxation and finance, and the commissioner of health, a fund, to be 43 known as the "Legionnaires' disease prevention fund". 44 2. Such fund shall consist of moneys required to be deposited thereto 45 pursuant to title nine of article twenty-one of the public health law 46 and all other moneys appropriated, credited, or transferred thereto from 47 any other fund or source pursuant to law. Nothing contained in this 48 section shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts or bequests 49 for the purposes of the fund as defined in this section and depositing 50 them into the fund according to law. 51 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.